tests/clusters.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:


 "[twol] мл/бл : no simplification ever(?)":
    рубль<n><nom> : рубль
    рубль<n><attr> : рубль
    рубль<n><gen> : рубльдиң
    рубль<n><dat> : рубльге
    рубль<n><acc> : рубльди
    рубль<n><abl> : рубльден
    рубль<n><pl><nom> : рубльдер
    рубль<n><px3sp><nom> : рубли
    рубль<n><px3sp><acc> : рублин
    ансамбль<n><pl><nom> : ансамбльдер
    ансамбль<n><px3sp><gen> : ансамблиниң
    кремль<n><dat> : кремльге
    кремль<n><all> : кремльче
    кремль<n><loc> : кремльде
    кремль<n><px3sp><nom> : кремли

 "[twol] кс : no simplification when syllable-final": 
    комплекс<n><nom> : комплекс
    комплекс<n><attr> : комплекс
    комплекс<n><gen> : комплекстиң
    комплекс<n><acc> : комплексти
    комплекс<n><pl><nom> : комплекстер

 "[twol] ст : no simplification at end of word": 
    область<n><nom> : область
    область<n><attr> : область

 "[twol] сс : no simplification when syllable-final": 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : класстарын 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><all> : класстарынче 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : класстарынга 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : класстарының 
    класс<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : класстары 

 "[twol] ст : no simplication at the end of the word": 
    үст<n><px3sp><loc> : үстүнде

 "[twol] кс : epenthesis and voicing when syllable-initial":
    комплекс<n><px3sp><nom> : комплекизи
    комплекс<n><px3sp><dat> : комплекизинге
    комплекс<n><px3sp><all> : комплекизинче

 "[twol] рс : epenthesis and voicing when syllable-initial":
    конкурс<n><px3sp><nom> : конкурузу
    конкурс<n><px3sp><all> : конкурузунче
    конкурс<n><px3sp><dat> : конкурузунга
    конкурс<n><px3sp><gen> : конкурузунуң


 "[twol] ст : simplification before consonant": 
    область<n><gen> : областың
    область<n><dat> : обласка
    область<n><abl> : областан
    область<n><all> : обласче
    область<n><loc> : областа
    область<n><acc> : областы
    область<n><pl><nom> : областар
    область<n><pl><abl> : областардан


 "[twol] ст : simplification and voicing before vowel": 
    область<n><px3sp><gen> : облазының
    область<n><px3sp><loc> : облазында
    область<n><px3sp><dat> : облазынга
    область<n><px3sp><all> : облазынче
    область<n><px3sp><abl> : облазындан
    артист<n><px3sp><nom> : артизи


 "[twol] сс : simplification and voicing before vowel": 
    класс<n><px1sg><gen> : клазымның 
    класс<n><px1sg><nom> : клазым 
    класс<n><px3sp><abl> : клазындан 
    класс<n><px3sp><acc> : клазын 
    класс<n><px3sp><all> : клазынче 
    класс<n><px3sp><dat> : клазынга 
    класс<n><px3sp><gen> : клазының 
    класс<n><px3sp><loc> : клазында 
    класс<n><px3sp><nom> : клазы 
    класс<n><px1pl><dat> : клазывыска 
    класс<n><px1pl><nom> : клазывыс 
    класс<n><px2pl><nom> : клазыңар 
